Wyoming, session 2025, SF0102.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 39-13-105(a)(v), (c)(ii), (v),
(h)(intro), (i) and (ii) is amended to read:
39-13-105. Exemptions.
(a) The following persons who are bona fide Wyoming
residents for at least three (3) years at the time of
claiming the exemption are entitled to receive the tax
exemption provided by W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xxiv):
(v) A surviving spouse, during widowhood or
widower hood, of any person qualifying under this
subsection or who died while serving honorably during the
war, conflict or period described in this section or the
surviving parents if there is no surviving spouse.
Surviving parents who are divorced and living separately
may both qualify separately for the exemption. The tax
exemption shall be applied to property the title to which
is held by the surviving spouse or surviving parents or to
property which is the subject of a trust created by or for
the benefit of the surviving spouse or surviving parents;
(c) Except as provided in subsection (g) of this
section, in order to receive the exemption provided by this
section the claimant shall file a sworn claim on or before
the fourth Monday in May with the county assessor of the
county in which the property against which the exemption is
sought is located indicating:
1

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0102
ENROLLED ACT NO. 68, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
(ii) That during the lifetime of the claimant,
or the claimant's spouse or the claimant's parents, the
claimant, or the claimant's spouse is or the claimant's
parents are listed as an owner of the property, that the
property is the subject of a trust created by or for the
benefit of the claimant, or the claimant's spouse or the
claimant's parents, or the claimant, or the claimant's
spouse is or the claimant's parents are listed as a
purchaser on a valid and effective contract for deed for
the property and evidence of the contract for deed has been
recorded with the county clerk;
(v) That the exemption shall be claimed by the
veteran or qualifying surviving spouse or qualifying
surviving parents in not more than one (1) county in this
state unless the surviving parents are divorced and living
in different counties.
(h) A surviving spouse, during widowhood or widower
hood, or the surviving parents if there is no surviving
spouse, is qualified shall qualify for the tax exemption
under W.S. 39-11-105(a)(xxiv) and is entitled to may apply
for it the exemption under the same procedure specified in
this section for veterans if:
(i) At the time of the spouse's death, both the
veteran and the veteran's spouse or parents were residents
of Wyoming;
(ii) The veteran's spouse has or parents have
been a resident residents of Wyoming for at least three (3)
years at the time the spouse claims or parents claim the
exemption; and
2

ORIGINAL SENATE
FILE NO. SF0102
ENROLLED ACT NO. 68, SENATE
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. The department of revenue shall promulgate
any rules necessary to implement this act.
Section 3.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.
(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the Senate.
Chief Clerk
3